Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-410
Officer; consider interests and factors;
liability; duties.

(1)
Each officer of a benefit corporation shall consider the interests and factors
described in subsection (1) of section 21-408 in the manner provided in that
subsection if:

(a) The officer has discretion
to act with respect to a matter; and

(b) It reasonably appears to the officer that the
matter may have a material effect on the creation by the benefit corporation
of general public benefit or a specific public benefit identified in the articles
of incorporation of the benefit corporation.

(2) The consideration of interests and
factors in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section does not
constitute a violation of section 21-2099.

(3) Except as provided in the articles of incorporation
or bylaws, an officer is not personally liable for monetary damages for:

(a) An action or inaction
as an officer in the course of performing the duties of an officer under subsection
(1) of this section if the officer performed the duties of the position in
compliance with section 21-2099 and this section; or

(b) Failure of the benefit corporation
to pursue or create general public benefit or specific public benefit.

(4) An officer does not have
a duty to a person that is a beneficiary of the general public benefit purpose
or a specific public benefit purpose of a benefit corporation arising from
the status of the person as a beneficiary.

(5) An officer who makes a business judgment in good
faith fulfills the duty under this section if the officer:

(a) Is not interested in
the subject of the business judgment;

(b) Is informed with respect to the subject of the
business judgment to the extent the officer reasonably believes to be appropriate
under the circumstances; and

(c)
Rationally believes that the business judgment is in the best interests of
the benefit corporation.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 10.